Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 Physical Examination of State Employees

Cross references.

Confidentiality of medical information, §

24-12-10

et seq.

Power of Department of Human Resources to require reporting of certain diseases and injuries, §

31-12-2

.

Disclosure of medical records and other medical information pertaining to the mentally ill, the mentally retarded, alcoholics, etc. §§

37-3-166

,

37-4-125

,

37-7-166

.

Medical and physical examination program: Prospective state employees, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of State Personnel Board, Chapter 478-4.

45-2-40.
Employees to furnish certificate of physical fitness for employment.

No person who is otherwise qualified shall be employed in any capacity by the state or any department or agency thereof unless the person is certified as meeting the standards of medical and physical fitness by a qualified medical practitioner within a prescribed number of calendar days after the date of an offer of employment. However, the State Personnel Board may provide for standards of medical and physical fitness for some positions that require only certification by the prospective employee and such certification may be accepted by the respective employing department without further assessment by a medical practitioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 808, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 189, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 76, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1094, § 1.

45-2-41.
Committee of doctors to develop fitness standards; licensed physician to make physical examination; contracts for assessments of employees; fee for committee members and consultants; certification.

The commissioner of administrative services, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, shall appoint up to five doctors of medicine licensed by the state and other specialists, as appropriate, to develop standards of medical and physical fitness required for persons about to be appointed to positions in the state service. Such standards shall be related to the duties required of specific positions in the state service. The commissioner of administrative services shall develop the forms to secure the information needed to determine if prospective employees meet the medical and physical fitness standards required to perform the essential functions of the relevant position.

If a physical examination is required by the standards of medical and physical fitness, a licensed medical practitioner may perform the assessment and report the findings to a physician in the employ of or under contract with the state or respective employing department. The licensed medical practitioner may be of the applicant’s choice and at the applicant’s expense or may be a licensed physician in the employ of or under contract with the state or respective employing department. When the licensed physician is in the employ of or under contract with the state or respective employing department, the assessment and findings shall be made to the respective department and shall be final, except as provided in the State Personnel Board rules.

The commissioner of administrative services may, through a competitive proposal process, enter into an agreement on behalf of the departments to contract with medical practitioners for the purpose of conducting assessments for medical and physical fitness as required by the standards of medical and physical fitness. In such case, each department may use the selected contractor as an expense of a departmental employee selection process or may recommend that prospective employees seek the examination at the contractor’s site at the prospective employee’s expense. If the prospective employee chooses to use a medical practitioner other than one selected by the department or under contract with the state on behalf of the department, the findings and recommendations of such other practitioner shall be furnished to the medical practitioner selected by the department or under contract with the state on behalf of the department for final determination of the medical and physical fitness of the prospective employee. Expenses for the medical practitioner under contract with the state on behalf of the department shall be paid by the respective employing department based upon the services provided by such medical practitioner.

The State Personnel Board is authorized to establish a fee and make payment of same to the consultants appointed by the commissioner of administrative services for services rendered in the development of standards of medical and physical fitness for state employees; provided, however, that no state employee shall receive additional compensation for services as a consultant for developing the standards of medical and physical fitness.

The certification required by Code Section 45-2-40 shall be completed as required in the rules of the State Personnel Board; provided, however, that if a physical examination is required by the standards for medical and physical fitness, the physical examination shall be completed prior to the date of appointment, and the reporting of results shall occur within a prescribed number of calendar days from the date of appointment.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 808, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 189, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 541, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 76, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1094, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-67/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-2-42.
State department or agency to furnish standards of fitness of positions.

The state department or agency shall furnish to the applicant the standards of medical and physical fitness for the position for which applied in such manner as to enable a medical practitioner to ascertain the physical capacity of the applicant to fulfill the requirements of employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 808, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 76, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1094, § 3.

45-2-43.
Examining medical practitioner to make report; conditions impairing prescribed duties; consent for distribution of additional confidential medical information; reports; confidentiality of files.

If a physical examination is required, the examining medical practitioner shall make a report certifying that the prospective employee has been examined and certified as not having any condition that would impair the fulfillment of the prescribed duties of the employment. However, if a condition exists which would impair the fulfillment of the prescribed duties, the medical practitioner shall identify such condition, the employing agency shall provide reasonable accommodation to the extent required by the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., and the medical practitioner shall certify that the prospective employee, with the accommodation, meets the standards of medical and physical fitness for the position. Additional confidential medical information should be given only with the consent of the applicant. The examining medical practitioner shall complete the necessary forms and findings in accordance with the rules of the State Personnel Board. All such medical information shall be retained in a separate, confidential file and not as a part of the personnel file.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 808, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 76, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1094, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a period was deleted at the end of the next to last sentence.

45-2-44.
State Personnel Board to adopt rules and regulations; expenditure of funds.

The State Personnel Board, subject to the approval of the Governor, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this article. The board, through the commissioner of administrative services, is authorized to expend allocated funds for the necessary forms and other incidental administrative expenses in effectuating this article. All other expenses shall be borne by the prospective employee or the respective employing department in accordance with the rules of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 808, § 5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 189, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1094, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-68/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-2-45.
Applicability of article.

This article shall not apply to department heads, temporary employees, other categories of employees of the state as defined by the State Personnel Board, or to students in the University System of Georgia in the employ of the state, nor shall it apply to any present employee. As used in this Code section, the term “temporary employee” means a person whose period of employment is of short duration or is part time as defined by the State Personnel Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 808, § 6; Ga. L. 1960, p. 189, § 4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 541, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1094, § 3.